Wyoming, session 2026, SF0070.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 99-3-3101 through 99-3-3104 are
created to read:
ARTICLE 31
2026 CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS
99-3-3101. Definitions.
The definitions in W.S. 99-3-101 apply to this article.
99-3-3102. General authorization.
The provisions of W.S. 99-3-102 apply to this article.
99-3-3103. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(a) Authorization is granted for the Level III new
development construction projects identified in this
section subject to the general conditions specified in W.S.
99-3-103, provided that W.S. 99-3-103(a)(iii) shall not
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
apply to the projects identified in this section unless
required by W.S. 41-2-121.
(b) Project – Alpine Well #4 Transmission Pipeline
2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Town of Alpine;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of water transmission pipeline, structures and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Four hundred twenty
thousand dollars ($420,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000.00) or fifty percent
(50%) of these actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriations: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two hundred
ten thousand dollars ($210,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account I on July 1, 2031;
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(c) Project – Cloud Seeding: Wind River and Sierra
Madre mountain ranges 2027 (ground-based):
(i) Project sponsor: The state of Wyoming;
(ii) Project purpose: To enhance the winter
snowpack in the Wind River and Sierra Madre mountain
ranges;
(iii) Project description: Conduct a
ground-based operational winter snowpack augmentation
program during the 2026-2027 season;
(iv) Total project budget: Eight hundred
ninety-one thousand four hundred twenty-nine dollars
($891,429.00);
(v) Special conditions: Prior to commencing
project operations, the Wyoming water development office
shall acquire funding commitments from other Colorado River
basin water users or other interested parties for a minimum
of one hundred percent (100%) of actual project operations
costs.
(d) Project – Gillette Red Hills Tank 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: City of Gillette;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal water supply;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Project description: Construction
engineering and construction of a tank, structures and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Five million one
hundred nineteen thousand dollars ($5,119,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
million five hundred fifty-nine thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,559,500.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these
actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriations: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two million
five hundred fifty-nine thousand five hundred dollars
($2,559,500.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account I on July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(e) Project – LaGrange Well Connection 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Town of LaGrange;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal water supply;
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of a well connection, well treatment, pumping
facilities, transmission pipelines, structures and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Seven hundred forty
thousand dollars ($740,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed three
hundred seventy thousand dollars ($370,000.00) or fifty
percent (50%) of these actual development costs, whichever
is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission three hundred
seventy thousand dollars ($370,000.00) or as much thereof
as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account I on
July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(f) Project – Little Snake River Battle Lake
Modification and Forest Management Demonstration Project
2026:
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) Project sponsor: Little Snake River
Conservation District and Savery-Little Snake River Water
Conservancy District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of forest management treatments, lake outlet,
structures and appurtenances necessary to make the project
function in the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Two million one
hundred eighty-four thousand dollars ($2,184,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, land access, permit
procurement, construction engineering and construction of
the project an amount not to exceed one million ninety-two
thousand dollars ($1,092,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of
these actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission one million
ninety-two thousand dollars ($1,092,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account I on
July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(g) Project - Small Water Development Projects – New
Development 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Eligible public entities;
(ii) Project purpose:
Multi-purpose - agriculture, recreation and environmental;
(iii) Project description: Small dams,
windmills, springs, guzzlers and other water collection,
storage and drinking systems, pipelines, and similar small
projects, to impound, develop and convey water for
livestock, wildlife, irrigation, environmental and
recreational purposes;
(iv) Total project budget: Two million dollars
($2,000,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to sponsors of small water development projects from
water development account I through the commission for the
design, permit procurement, project land procurement,
construction engineering and construction of the project a
total amount not to exceed one million dollars
($1,000,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of the actual
development costs of the small water development projects,
whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission one million
dollars ($1,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary
to carry out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended
funds appropriated under this subsection shall revert to
water development account I on July 1, 2031;
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vii) Definition: "Small water development
project" means a project where the maximum financial
contribution from the commission is thirty-five thousand
dollars ($35,000.00) or less;
(viii) Special conditions:
(A) The commission may grant a sponsor
fifty percent (50%) of the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction cost of a small water development project. No
grant shall be more than thirty-five thousand dollars
($35,000.00);
(B) The small water development project
sponsors shall substantiate the public benefit that will be
derived from proposed small water development projects;
(C) The commission may make monthly
progress payments of not more than fifty percent (50%) of
eligible monthly project expenses;
(D) An appropriate land management or
resource management entity shall certify that the proposed
small water development project will meet expectations and
that appropriate engineering standards, as approved by the
commission, will be adhered to;
(E) The establishment of criteria and
administrative procedures for the development of small
water development projects under this subsection and
decisions of the commission relating to the
recommendations, prioritization or disqualification of
small water development projects are specifically exempt
from the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Act including judicial review under W.S. 16-3-114 and
16-3-115;
(F) W.S. 16-6-116 shall not apply to a
small water development project unless the project sponsor
determines the small water development project meets the
definition of a "public work" as defined in W.S.
16-6-101(a)(ix).
99-3-3104. Level III construction projects –
rehabilitation.
(a) Authorization is granted for the Level III
rehabilitation construction projects identified in this
section subject to the general conditions specified in W.S.
99-3-104, provided that W.S. 99-3-104(a)(iii) shall not
apply to the projects identified in this section unless
required by W.S. 41-2-121.
(b) Project – Big Horn Canal ID Five Mile Pipeline
2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Big Horn Canal Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of a pipeline, wasteway, structures and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Four million five
hundred forty-four thousand six hundred dollars
($4,544,600.00);
9

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
million two hundred seventy-two thousand three hundred
dollars ($2,272,300.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these
actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
million two hundred seventy-two thousand three hundred
dollars ($2,272,300.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these
actual development costs, whichever is less, for a term of
twenty (20) years from the date the commission determines
that project benefits accrue to the sponsor, at an annual
interest rate of four percent (4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission four million
five hundred forty-four thousand six hundred dollars
($4,544,600.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2031;
(viii) Special conditions: The appropriation of
funds for this project is contingent upon the transfer of
funds to water development account II as described in
section 3 of this act or transfer from another funding
source.
10

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) Project – Cody Canal ID Lead Diversion
Rehabilitation 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Cody Canal Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of a diversion structure and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Four million four
hundred forty-two thousand dollars ($4,442,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
million two hundred twenty-one thousand dollars
($2,221,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
million one hundred two thousand dollars ($2,102,000.00) or
forty-seven and three-tenths percent (47.3%) of these
actual development costs, whichever is less, for a term of
forty (40) years from the date the commission determines
11

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
that project benefits accrue to the sponsor, at an annual
interest rate of four percent (4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission four million
three hundred twenty-three thousand dollars ($4,323,000.00)
or as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose
of this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under
this subsection shall revert to water development account
II on July 1, 2031;
(viii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring two and seven-tenths percent (2.7%) of the total
project budget from other sources;
(B) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(d) Project – Cowley Transmission Pipeline
Replacement 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Town of Cowley;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal and rural
domestic water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
pre-construction of water transmission pipelines,
structures and appurtenances necessary to make the project
function in the manner intended;
12

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iv) Total project budget: Three hundred
sixty-four thousand dollars ($364,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design and pre-construction
of the project an amount not to exceed one hundred
eighty-two thousand dollars ($182,000.00) or fifty percent
(50%) of these actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one hundred
eighty-two thousand dollars ($182,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total project budget
from other sources;
(B) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(e) Project – Deaver ID Rehabilitation Phase II 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Deaver Irrigation District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
13

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of pipelines, structures and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Two hundred seventeen
thousand five hundred five dollars ($217,505.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the purchase of project
materials as supported by vendor invoices and as approved
by the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred
thirty-five thousand three hundred twenty-five dollars
($135,325.00) or one hundred percent (100%) of the approved
materials costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one hundred
thirty-five thousand three hundred twenty-five dollars
($135,325.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for all
project costs with the exception of the purchase of project
materials as supported by vendor invoices and as approved
by the commission, up to the amount appropriated in this
subsection;
(B) The sponsor is responsible for
retaining professional engineering services to design the
14

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
project, compile materials and bidding documents and
monitor construction activities including the installation
of project components and the tracking of project
expenditures;
(C) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(f) Project – Elk Water Users ID Roan Wash Spill
Rehabilitation 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Elk Water Users Irrigation
District and Lovell Irrigation District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of a canal spill structure and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Six hundred forty-one
thousand dollars ($641,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed three
hundred twenty thousand five hundred dollars ($320,500.00)
or fifty percent (50%) of these actual development costs,
whichever is less;
15

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed three
hundred twenty thousand five hundred dollars ($320,500.00)
or fifty percent (50%) of these actual development costs,
whichever is less, for a term of thirty (30) years from the
date the commission determines that project benefits accrue
to the sponsor, at an annual interest rate of four percent
(4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission six hundred
forty-one thousand dollars ($641,000.00) or as much thereof
as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2031.
(g) Project – Glenrock Transmission Pipeline 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Town of Glenrock;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
pre-construction of water transmission pipelines,
structures and appurtenances necessary to make the project
function in the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Nine hundred
thirty-four thousand dollars ($934,000.00);
16

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design and pre-construction
of the project an amount not to exceed four hundred
sixty-seven thousand dollars ($467,000.00) or fifty percent
(50%) of these actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission four hundred
sixty-seven thousand dollars ($467,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total project budget
from other sources;
(B) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(h) Project – GID 3.6 East Springer Pipeline Project
2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Goshen Irrigation District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of pipelines, structures and appurtenances
17

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Two hundred twenty
thousand eight hundred eighty dollars ($220,880.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the purchase of project
materials as supported by vendor invoices and as approved
by the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred six
thousand one hundred dollars ($106,100.00) or one hundred
percent (100%) of the approved materials costs, whichever
is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one hundred
six thousand one hundred dollars ($106,100.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for all
project costs with the exception of the purchase of project
materials as supported by vendor invoices and as approved
by the commission, up to the amount appropriated in this
subsection;
(B) The sponsor is responsible for
retaining professional engineering services to design the
project, compile materials and bidding documents and
monitor construction activities including the installation
18

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
of project components and the tracking of project
expenditures;
(C) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(j) Project – GID 29.4 Pipeline Project Phase III
2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Goshen Irrigation District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of pipelines, structures and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Three hundred
eighty-four thousand eight hundred forty-five dollars
($384,845.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the purchase of project
materials as supported by vendor invoices and as approved
by the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred
seventy-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($177,500.00)
or one hundred percent (100%) of the approved materials
costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one hundred
19

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
seventy-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($177,500.00)
or as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose
of this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under
this subsection shall revert to water development account
II on July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for all
project costs with the exception of the purchase of project
materials as supported by vendor invoices and as approved
by the commission, up to the amount appropriated in this
subsection;
(B) The sponsor is responsible for
retaining professional engineering services to design the
project, compile materials and bidding documents and
monitor construction activities including the installation
of project components and the tracking of project
expenditures;
(C) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(k) Project – Greybull Tank and Phase I Pipeline
2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Town of Greybull;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal and rural
domestic water supply;
20

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Project description: Design and
pre-construction of water transmission pipelines,
structures and appurtenances and design and construction of
tank, structures and appurtenances necessary to make the
project function in the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Three million one
hundred sixty-four thousand dollars ($3,164,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed one
million five hundred eighty-two thousand dollars
($1,582,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one million
five hundred eighty-two thousand dollars ($1,582,000.00) or
as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total project budget
from other sources;
(B) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
21

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(m) Project – Greybull Valley ID Upper Sunshine
Outlet Works 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Greybull Valley Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of reservoir intake, structures and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Two million six
hundred twenty-three thousand two hundred dollars
($2,623,200.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed one
million three hundred eleven thousand six hundred dollars
($1,311,600.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed one
million three hundred eleven thousand six hundred dollars
22

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
($1,311,600.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less, for a term of forty
(40) years from the date the commission determines that
project benefits accrue to the sponsor, at an annual
interest rate of four percent (4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission two million
six hundred twenty-three thousand two hundred dollars
($2,623,200.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2031;
(viii) Special conditions: The appropriation of
funds for this project is contingent upon the transfer of
funds to water development account II as described in
section 3 of this act or transfer from another funding
source.
(n) Project – Newcastle Transmission Pipeline 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: City of Newcastle;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal and rural
domestic water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of transmission pipelines, structures and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Two million three
hundred two thousand six hundred dollars ($2,302,600.00);
23

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed one
million one hundred fifty-one thousand three hundred
dollars ($1,151,300.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these
actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one million
one hundred fifty-one thousand three hundred dollars
($1,151,300.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total project budget
from other sources;
(B) No funds granted for this project under
paragraph (v) of this subsection shall be expended until
the commission determines that the sponsor has allowed
water sales outside city limits;
(C) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(o) Project – Owl Creek Re-Lift Pump Station and
Dempsey Diversion 2026:
24

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) Project sponsor: Owl Creek Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
pre-construction of pump station, diversion, structures and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: One hundred
eighty-eight thousand dollars ($188,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design and pre-construction
of the project an amount not to exceed ninety-four thousand
dollars ($94,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design and pre-construction
of the project an amount not to exceed ninety-four thousand
dollars ($94,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less, for a term of twenty
(20) years from the date the commission determines that
project benefits accrue to the sponsor, at an annual
interest rate of four percent (4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one hundred
eighty-eight thousand dollars ($188,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
25

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2031.
(p) Project – Powder River ID Fifteen Mile Siphon
2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Powder River Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of siphon, structures and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Two million two
hundred thirty thousand dollars ($2,230,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed one
million one hundred fifteen thousand dollars
($1,115,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed one
million one hundred fifteen thousand dollars
26

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
($1,115,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less, for a term of forty
(40) years from the date the commission determines that
project benefits accrue to the sponsor, at an annual
interest rate of four percent (4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission two million
two hundred thirty thousand dollars ($2,230,000.00) or as
much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2031.
(q) Project – Riverton West Main Street Transmission
Pipeline 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: City of Riverton;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of transmission pipelines, structures and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Five million six
hundred ninety-five thousand dollars ($5,695,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
million eight hundred forty-seven thousand five hundred
27

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
dollars ($2,847,500.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these
actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission two million
eight hundred forty-seven thousand five hundred dollars
($2,847,500.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total project budget
from other sources;
(B) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(r) Project – Shoshoni Well #6 and Transmission
Pipeline 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Town of Shoshoni;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of well upgrades, transmission pipelines,
structures and appurtenances necessary to make the project
function in the manner intended;
28

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iv) Total project budget: One million three
hundred fifty-eight thousand dollars ($1,358,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed six
hundred seventy-nine thousand dollars ($679,000.00) or
fifty percent (50%) of these actual development costs,
whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission six hundred
seventy-nine thousand dollars ($679,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total project budget
from other sources;
(B) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
(s) Project – Sidon ID Byron Lateral 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Sidon Irrigation District;
29

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
pre-construction of pipelines, structures and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Four hundred eighteen
thousand dollars ($418,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design and pre-construction
of the project an amount not to exceed two hundred nine
thousand dollars ($209,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of
these actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission two hundred
nine thousand dollars ($209,000.00) or as much thereof as
is necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account II on July 1, 2031;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total project budget
from other sources;
(B) The appropriation of funds for this
project is contingent upon the transfer of funds to water
development account II as described in section 3 of this
act or transfer from another funding source.
30

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(t) Project - Small Water Development Projects –
Rehabilitation 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Eligible public entities;
(ii) Project purpose:
Multi-purpose - agriculture, recreation and environmental;
(iii) Project description: Rehabilitation and
replacement of small dams, windmills, springs, guzzlers and
other water collection, storage and drinking systems,
pipelines, and similar small projects, to impound, develop
and convey water for livestock, wildlife, irrigation,
environmental and recreational purposes;
(iv) Total project budget: One million dollars
($1,000,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to sponsors of small water development projects from
water development account II through the commission for the
design, permit procurement, project land procurement,
construction engineering and construction of small water
development projects a total amount not to exceed five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) or fifty percent
(50%) of the actual development costs of the small water
development projects, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account II on July 1, 2031;
31

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vii) Definition: "Small water development
project" means a project where the maximum financial
contribution from the commission is thirty-five thousand
dollars ($35,000.00) or less;
(viii) Special conditions:
(A) The commission may grant a sponsor
fifty percent (50%) of the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction cost of a small water development project. No
grant shall be more than thirty-five thousand dollars
($35,000.00);
(B) The small water development project
sponsors shall substantiate the public benefit that will be
derived from proposed small water development projects;
(C) The commission may make monthly
progress payments of not more than fifty percent (50%) of
eligible monthly project expenses;
(D) An appropriate land management or
resource management entity shall certify that the proposed
small water development project will meet expectations and
that appropriate engineering standards, as approved by the
commission, will be adhered to;
(E) The establishment of criteria and
administrative procedures for the development of small
water development projects under this subsection and
decisions of the commission relating to the
recommendations, prioritization or disqualification of
small water development projects are specifically exempt
from the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure
32

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Act including judicial review under W.S. 16-3-114 and
16-3-115;
(F) W.S. 16-6-116 shall not apply to a
small water development project unless the project sponsor
determines the small water development project meets the
definition of a "public work" as defined in W.S.
16-6-101(a)(ix).
(u) Project – Tillard Canal Rehabilitation and Pump
Station 2026:
(i) Project sponsor: Tillard Canal Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
pre-construction of pump station, structures and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Seventy-three
thousand one hundred dollars ($73,100.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design and pre-construction
of the project an amount not to exceed fifty-four thousand
eight hundred twenty-five dollars ($54,825.00) or
seventy-five percent (75%) of these actual development
costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
33

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
through the commission for the design and pre-construction
of the project an amount not to exceed eighteen thousand
two hundred seventy-five dollars ($18,275.00) or
twenty-five percent (25%) of these actual development
costs, whichever is less, for a term of ten (10) years from
the date the commission determines that project benefits
accrue to the sponsor, at an annual interest rate of four
percent (4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission
seventy-three thousand one hundred dollars ($73,100.00) or
as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2031.
Section 2. W.S. 99-3-1503(g)(vi), 99-3-2003(b)(vi),
99-3-2103(b)(vi), 99-3-2203(b)(vi), 99-3-2205(d)(vii),
99-3-2303(e)(vi), 99-3-2406(b)(vii) and (j)(vii),
99-3-2604(b)(vi) and 99-3-3003(d)(iii) through (vi) are
amended to read:
99-3-1503. Level III construction projects - new
development.
(g) Project – Ethete Water Supply:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two million
dollars ($2,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary
to carry out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended
funds appropriated under this subsection shall revert to
water development account I on July 1, 2026 2028;
34

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
99-3-2003. Level III construction projects - new
development.
(b) Project – Arapahoe Pipeline and Tank:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two million
four hundred twenty thousand dollars ($2,420,000.00) or as
much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account I on
July 1, 2026 2027;
99-3-2103. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(b) Project – Arapahoe Water Supply 2016:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two million
two hundred forty-seven thousand eight hundred fifty
dollars ($2,247,850.00) or as much thereof as is necessary
to carry out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended
funds appropriated under this subsection shall revert to
water development account I on July 1, 2026 2028;.
99-3-2203. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(b) Project – Broken Wheel Ranch Water Supply 2017:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission nine hundred
thirteen thousand fifty dollars ($913,050.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
35

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account I on
July 1, 2026 2027;
99-3-2205. Level III construction projects – dams and
reservoirs.
(d) Project – Alkali Creek Reservoir:
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account III to the commission fifty-nine
million dollars ($59,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account III on July 1, 2026
2027. It is the intent of the legislature that no further
time extensions shall be authorized for this project.
Beginning January 1, 2027, funds from the appropriation
made in this paragraph shall not be expended or used to
exercise eminent domain for the purposes of this project.
99-3-2303. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(e) Project – Melody Ranch Water System Improvements
2018:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission nine hundred
forty-four thousand seven hundred dollars ($944,700.00) or
as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account I on
July 1, 2026 2028;
36

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
99-3-2406. Level III construction projects –
rehabilitation.
(b) Project – Austin-Wall Reservoir Rehabilitation
2019:
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission three
hundred seventy-four thousand dollars ($374,000.00) or as
much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2026 2028;
(j) Project – Interstate Diversion Structure
Rehabilitation 2019:
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission four hundred
twenty thousand dollars ($420,000.00) or as much thereof as
is necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account II on July 1, 2026
2028.
99-3-2604. Level III construction projects –
rehabilitation.
(b) Project – Interstate Irrigation and Reservoir
Irrigation District Improvements 2021:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission two million
eight hundred twenty-seven thousand four hundred dollars
($2,827,400.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
37

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2026 2028;
99-3-3003. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(d) Project – Hoback Junction Public Water System
2025:
(iii) Project description: Design, and
pre-construction and construction of a diversion structure,
pumping facilities, water transmission pipelines, tank,
structures and appurtenances necessary to make the project
function in the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Five hundred
forty-eight thousand nine hundred dollars ($548,900.00) Two
million four hundred ninety-seven thousand dollars
($2,497,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, and pre-construction,
construction engineering and construction of the project an
amount not to exceed two hundred seventy-four thousand four
hundred fifty dollars ($274,450.00) one million two hundred
forty-eight thousand five hundred dollars ($1,248,500.00)
or fifty percent (50%) of these actual development costs,
whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriations: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two hundred
seventy-four thousand four hundred fifty dollars
38

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
($274,450.00) one million two hundred forty-eight thousand
five hundred dollars ($1,248,500.00) or as much thereof as
is necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account I on July 1, 2030;
Section 3.
(a) The Wyoming water development commission is
hereby authorized to transfer sixteen million two hundred
twenty‑five thousand dollars ($16,225,000.00) from water
development account I created by W.S. 41-2-124(a)(i) to
water development account II created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(ii).
(b) In accordance with W.S. 41-2-115(c), upon a
finding that the transfer of the test well, Sheep Mountain
No. 2, developed as part of the level II feasibility study
authorized under 2017 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 65,
Section 2 as amended by 2023 Wyoming Session Laws Chapter
186, Section 6, to the city of Douglas is desirable and in
the public interest and that the city is capable of
constructing, operating and maintaining the project and
accomplishing the public interest, the water development
commission shall transfer to the city of Douglas the test
well, Sheep Mountain No. 2, developed as part of a level II
feasibility study for further development by the city,
provided the city of Douglas agrees to terms outlined by
the commission for reimbursement of the expense of
predevelopment costs, an amount which shall be not less
than six hundred ten thousand eight hundred thirty-eight
dollars ($610,838.00), payment for property and assurances
of construction, operation and maintenance of the test
well, Sheep Mountain No. 2, in compliance with all
applicable state and federal laws.
39

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) To the extent funds are transferred under
subsection (a) of this section, the Wyoming water
development commission is hereby authorized to transfer two
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000.00) from
water development account II created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(ii) to water development account I created by
W.S. 41-2-124(a)(i). This subsection is effective July 1,
2026.
Section 4. There is appropriated one hundred
fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000.00) from the general
fund to the Wyoming agricultural experiment station (WAES)
within the college of agriculture and natural resources to
be deposited into a separate account, which account shall
be expended to conduct a study to quantify how forest
management treatments under the Little Snake River Battle
Lake Modification and Forest Management Demonstration
Project 2026 authorized under section 1 of this act affect
evapotranspiration and potential water yield. Of the
appropriation under this section, not less than thirty-five
thousand dollars ($35,000.00) shall be used to contract
with an online platform for mapping evapotranspiration at
the scale necessary to conduct the study under this
section. The results of the study under this section shall
be reported to the select water committee not later than
November 1, 2030. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2030. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2030.
Section 5.
40

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(a) The Wyoming water development office shall
conduct a study of the small water project program. The
study required under this section shall be in accordance
with all of the following:
(i) The study shall consider the application and
funding process for small water projects, including
application requirements and studies required for an
application to be reviewed under the program;
(ii) The study shall consider the process for
reviewing completed applications for the small water
project program, including:
(A) The extent to which additional
evaluations, whether conducted internally or externally,
are required;
(B) Whether reviews include or duplicate
reviews already conducted or completed by the applicant
before submitting a complete application;
(C) Whether additional costs are imposed on
the applicant, the state or both in reviewing and
evaluating project applications.
(iii) The Wyoming water development office shall
review its rules and policies associated with the small
water project program and consider whether changes can be
made to improve efficiencies and reduce the time and cost
associated with submitting and reviewing applications;
(iv) The study shall consider and develop
methods for:
41

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) Streamlining and incorporating
efficiencies in the application and review process for
small water projects;
(B) Reducing costs of the application and
review process for both the applicant and the state.
(v) Not later than November 1, 2026, the Wyoming
water development office shall report to the select water
committee on the results of the study required under this
section.
42

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 6. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
43